Missouri, session 2026, HB2422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 59.319 and 60.590, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 59.319 and 60.590, to read as follows:
59.319. 1. A user fee of [four] five dollars shall be charged and collected by every
recorder in this state, over and above any other fees required by law, as a condition precedent
to the recording of any instrument. The state portion of the fee shall be forwarded monthly by
each recorder of deeds to the state director of revenue, and the fees so forwarded shall be
deposited by the director in the state treasury. Two dollars of such fee shall be retained by the
recorder and deposited in a recorder's fund and not in county general revenue for record
storage, microfilming, and preservation, including anything necessarily pertaining thereto.
The recorder's funds shall be kept in a special fund by the treasurer and shall be budgeted and
expended at the direction of the recorder and shall not be used to substitute for or subsidize
any allocation of general revenue for the operation of the recorder's office without the express
consent of the recorder. The recorder's fund may be audited by the appropriate auditing
agency, and any unexpended balance shall be left in the fund to accumulate from year to year
with interest.
2. An additional fee of three dollars shall be charged and collected by every recorder
in this state, over and above any other fees required by law, as a condition precedent to the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2422 2
recording of any instruments specified in subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 1 of section
59.330. The fees collected from this additional three dollars per recorded instrument shall be
forwarded monthly by each recorder of deeds to the state director of revenue, and the fees so
forwarded shall be deposited by the director in the state treasury.
3. The state treasurer and the commissioner of administration shall establish an
appropriate account within the state treasury and in accordance with the state's accounting
methods. Any receipt required by this section to be deposited in the state treasury shall be
credited as follows:
(1) The amount of [one dollar] two dollars for each fee collected under subsection 1
of this section shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited to the "Missouri Land Survey
Fund" which is hereby created to be utilized for the purposes of sections 60.510 to 60.620 and
section 60.670. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund and may approve
disbursements from the fund in accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180. Any funds
previously collected by the state treasurer to be utilized for the purposes of sections 60.510 to
60.620 and section 60.670 shall transfer to the Missouri land survey fund. Any portion of the
fund not immediately needed for the purposes authorized shall be invested by the state
treasurer as provided by the constitution and laws of this state. All income, interest, and
moneys earned from such investments shall be deposited in the Missouri land survey fund.
Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of the fiscal year is exempt from the
provisions of section 33.080 relating to the transfer of unexpended balances to the general
revenue fund;
(2) The amount of one dollar for each fee collected under subsection 1 of this section
to an account to be utilized by the secretary of state for additional preservation of local
records; and
(3) The amount of three dollars collected under subsection 2 of this section into the
Missouri housing trust fund as designated in section 215.034.
60.590. 1. On request of the department of agriculture or the state land surveyor, all
city and county recorders of deeds, together with all departments, boards or agencies of state
government, county, or city government, shall furnish to the department of agriculture or the
state land surveyor certified copies of desired records which are in their custody. This service
shall be free of cost when possible; otherwise, it shall be at actual cost of reproduction of the
records. On the same basis of cost, the department of agriculture shall furnish records within
its custody to other agencies or departments of state, county or city, certifying them.
2. The department of agriculture may produce, reproduce and sell maps, plats,
reports, studies, and records, and shall establish by rule the fees necessary to reflect the
costs associated with the production and reproduction of the requested instruments or
records under this section. The commission shall recommend to the department of

HB 2422 3
agriculture the charges therefor. All income received shall be promptly deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the department of agriculture land survey revolving services fund.
3. The department of agriculture may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔